Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-203
General powers.

The trust company shall have power:

(1) To have a corporate name;

(2) To have a corporate seal;

(3) To sue and be sued and complain and defend in all courts of law and equity;

(4) To receive reasonable compensation for all services performed by it under the Nebraska Trust Company Act;

(5) To make bylaws not inconsistent with the act or its articles of incorporation for the management of its affairs; and

(6) To appoint or elect such officers and agents as the business of the corporation may require.

Laws 1911, c. 31, § 2, p. 188;

R.S.1913, § 740;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XVIII, § 4, p. 718;

C.S.1922, § 8065;

C.S.1929, § 8-203;

R.S.1943, § 8-203;

Laws 1993, LB 81, § 16;

Laws 1998, LB 1321, § 35.